test/src/morphology/V-xadasj_gt-norm.yaml
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2: хадавэн
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3: хадавы
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1: хадавэниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2: хадавэдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3: хадавэхэʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1: хадавэваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2: хадавэдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3: хадавыˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: хадавэв
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: хадавэр
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: хадавэда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: хадавэмиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: хадавэриʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: хадавэдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: хадавэваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: хадавэраˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: хадавэдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: хадавэхэюн
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: хадавэхэюд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: хадавэхэюда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: хадавэхэюниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: хадавэхэюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: хадавэхэюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: хадавэхэюнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: хадавэхэюдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: хадавэхэюдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: хадавын
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: хадавыд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: хадавыда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: хадавыниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: хадавыдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: хадавыдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: хадавынаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: хадавыдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: хадавыдоʼ   
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1: хадавэдамзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2: хадавэнась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3: [хадавысь, хадавэсь]  
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1: хадавэнинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2: хадавэдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3: хадавэхэнзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1: хадавэваць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2: хадавэдаць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3: [хадавыць, хадавэць]   
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: хадавэвась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: хадавэрась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: хадавэдась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: хадавэминзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: хадавэринзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: хадавэдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: хадавэваць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: хадавэраць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: хадавэдонзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: хадавэхэюнась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: хадавэхэюдась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: хадавэхэюдась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: хадавэхэюнинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: хадавэхэюдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: хадавэхэюдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: хадавэхэюнаць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: хадавэхэюдаць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: хадавэхэюдонзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: хадавынась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: хадавыдась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: хадавыдась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: хадавынинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: хадавыдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: хадавыдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: хадавынаць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: хадавыдаць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: хадавыдонзь 
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1: хаданакэдмʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2: хаданакэн
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3: хаданакы
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1: хаданакэниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2: хаданакэдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3: хаданакэхэʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1: хаданакэваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2: хаданакэдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3: хаданакыˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: хаданакэв
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: хаданакэр
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: хаданакэда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: хаданакэмиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: хаданакэриʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: хаданакэдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: хаданакэваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: хаданакэраˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: хаданакэдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: хаданакэхэюн
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: хаданакэхэюд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: хаданакэхэюда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: хаданакэхэюниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: хаданакэхэюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: хаданакэхэюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: хаданакэхэюнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: хаданакэхэюдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: хаданакэхэюдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: хаданакын
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: хаданакыд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: хаданакыда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: хаданакыниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: хаданакыдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: хаданакыдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: хаданакынаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: хаданакыдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: хаданакыдоʼ   
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg1: хаданакэдамзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg2: хаданакэнась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg3: [хаданакысь, хаданакэсь] 
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu1: хаданакэнинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu2: хаданакэдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu3: хаданакэханзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl1: хаданакэваць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl2: хаданакэдаць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl3: [хаданакыць, хаданакэць]    
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: хаданакэвась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: хаданакэрась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: хаданакэдась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: хаданакэминзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: хаданакэринзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: хаданакэдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: хаданакэваць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: хаданакэраць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: хаданакэдонзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: хаданакэхэюнась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: хаданакэхэюдась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: хаданакэхэюдась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: хаданакэхэюнинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: хаданакэхэюдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: хаданакэхэюдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: хаданакэхэюнаць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: хаданакэхэюдаць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: хаданакэхэюдонзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: хаданакынась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: хаданакыдась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: хаданакыдась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: хаданакынинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: хаданакыдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: хаданакыдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: хаданакынаць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: хаданакыдаць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: хаданакыдонзь     
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg1: хадавэкэдмʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg2: хадавэкэн
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg3: хадавэкы
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu1: хадавэкэниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu2: хадавэкэдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu3: хадавэкэхэʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl1: хадавэкэваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl2: хадавэкэдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl3: хадавэкыˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg1+OcSg3: хадавэкэв
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg2+OcSg3: хадавэкэр
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg3+OcSg3: хадавэкэда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu1+OcSg3: хадавэкэмиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu2+OcSg3: хадавэкэриʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu3+OcSg3: хадавэкэдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl1+OcSg3: хадавэкэваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl2+OcSg3: хадавэкэраˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl3+OcSg3: хадавэкэдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg1+OcDu3: хадавэкэхэюн
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg2+OcDu3: хадавэкэхэюд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg3+OcDu3: хадавэкэхэюда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu1+OcDu3: хадавэкэхэюниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu2+OcDu3: хадавэкэхэюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu3+OcDu3: хадавэкэхэюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl1+OcDu3: хадавэкэхэюнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl2+OcDu3: хадавэкэхэюдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl3+OcDu3: хадавэкэхэюдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg1+OcPl3: хадавэкын
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg2+OcPl3: хадавэкыд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg3+OcPl3: хадавэкыда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu1+OcPl3: хадавэкыниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu2+OcPl3: хадавэкыдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu3+OcPl3: хадавэкыдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl1+OcPl3: хадавэкынаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl2+OcPl3: хадавэкыдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl3+OcPl3: хадавэкыдоʼ      
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg1: хадабцакэдмʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg2: хадабцакэн
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg3: хадабцакы
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu1: хадабцакэниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu2: хадабцакэдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu3: хадабцакэхэʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl1: хадабцакэваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl2: хадабцакэдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl3: хадабцакыˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg1+OcSg3: хадабцакэв
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg2+OcSg3: хадабцакэр
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg3+OcSg3: хадабцакэда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu1+OcSg3: хадабцакэмиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu2+OcSg3: хадабцакэриʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu3+OcSg3: хадабцакэдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl1+OcSg3: хадабцакэваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl2+OcSg3: хадабцакэраˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl3+OcSg3: хадабцакэдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg1+OcDu3: хадабцакэхэюн
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg2+OcDu3: хадабцакэхэюд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg3+OcDu3: хадабцакэхэюда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu1+OcDu3: хадабцакэхэюниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu2+OcDu3: хадабцакэхэюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu3+OcDu3: хадабцакэхэюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl1+OcDu3: хадабцакэхэюнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl2+OcDu3: хадабцакэхэюдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl3+OcDu3: хадабцакэхэюдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg1+OcPl3: хадабцакын
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg2+OcPl3: хадабцакыд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg3+OcPl3: хадабцакыда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu1+OcPl3: хадабцакыниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu2+OcPl3: хадабцакыдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu3+OcPl3: хадабцакыдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl1+OcPl3: хадабцакынаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl2+OcPl3: хадабцакыдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl3+OcPl3: хадабцакыдоʼ      
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg1: хаданархадмʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg2: хаданархан
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg3: хаданарха
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu1: хаданарханиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu2: хаданархадиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu3: хаданархахаʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl1: хаданархаваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl2: хаданархадаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl3: хаданархаˮ
